Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB211.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 315.15. Contributions for Grants to Fire Companies and Emergency Medical Services Companies.--(a) Beginning with taxable years ending after December 31, 2025, the department shall provide a space on the Pennsylvania individual income tax return form whereby an individual may contribute to grant 12345678910111213141516171819202122 programs administered by the Office of State Fire Commissioner under 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 78 Subchs. B (relating to Fire Company Grant Program) and C (relating to Emergency Medical Services Grant Program). An individual may so contribute by designating the amount of the contribution, not less than one dollar ($1), on the Pennsylvania individual income tax return. The designated contribution shall be deducted from the tax refund to which the individual is entitled and shall not constitute a change against the income tax revenues due to the Commonwealth.(b) The department shall determine annually the total amount designated under this section, less reasonable administrative costs, and shall report the amount to the State Treasurer who shall transfer the amount to a restricted revenue account within the General Fund to be used by the Office of State Fire Commissioner to fund grants issued by the Office of State Fire Commissioner under 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 78 Subchs. B and C . (c) The department shall provide adequate information concerning the checkoff for grant programs administered by the Office of State Fire Commissioner under 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 78 Subchs. B and C in its instructions which accompany the Pennsylvania income tax return forms. The information concerning the checkoff shall include the listing of an address furnished by the Office of State Fire Commissioner to which contributions may be sent by taxpayers wishing to contribute to this effort but who do not receive refunds.(d) The Office of State Fire Commissioner shall report annually to the respective committees of the Senate and the House of Representatives which have jurisdiction over the Office of State Fire Commissioner on the amount received through the checkoff plan and how the money was utilized.20250SB0211PN0161 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0211PN0161 - 3 - 1